Tennessee, session 114, SB2327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person commits the offense of interfering with a religious institution if the
person acts to intentionally obstruct, disturb, or interfere with the activities of the religious
institution by making an utterance, gesture, or display in a manner that is offensive to the
sensibilities of an ordinary person, either within the place where the meeting is held, or
so near it as to disturb the order and solemnity of the activities.
(b) As used in this section, "religious institution" means a church, temple,
synagogue, mosque, or other place of worship.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2327
012208
- 1 -